Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-1801
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Child abuse means an offense under section 28-707;

(2) Commission shall mean the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice;

(3) Committee shall mean the Crime Victim's Reparations Committee;

(4) Dependent shall mean a relative of a deceased victim who was dependent upon the victim's income at the time of death, including a child of a victim born after a victim's death;

(5) Domestic assault means an offense under section 28-323;

(6) Executive director shall mean the executive director of the commission;

(7) Health care provider means any person licensed or certified by the State of Nebraska to deliver health care under the Uniform Credentialing Act and any health care facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act. Health care provider includes any professional corporation or other professional entity comprised of such health care providers;

(8) Personal injury shall mean actual bodily harm;

(9) Relative shall mean spouse, parent, grandparent, stepparent, natural born child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half sister, or spouse's parent;

(10) Sexual assault has the same meaning as in section 29-4309; and

(11) Victim shall mean a person who is injured or killed as a result of conduct specified in section 81-1818.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 186, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 21;

Laws 2021, LB497, § 1.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.